Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1545
Noncompliance; effect.

Failure by an insurance company subject to sections 60-3,136 to 60-3,139 to comply with the requirements of such sections and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such sections by the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 2002, LB 488, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 229.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.